Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.380

Number of jurors required to render verdict.

In all trials by juries of six in the superior court, except criminal trials, when five of the jurors agree upon a verdict, the verdict so agreed upon shall be signed by the presiding juror, and the verdict shall stand as the verdict of the whole jury, and have all the force and effect of a verdict agreed to by six jurors. In cases where the jury is twelve in number, a verdict reached by ten shall have the same force and effect as described above, and the same procedures shall be followed.

[ 2003 c 406 s 21; 1972 ex.s. c 57 s 4; 1895 c 36 s 1; RRS s 358.]

NOTES:

Trial by jury: State Constitution Art. 1 s 21.